Nebraska, session 109, LB423.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB423 LB423
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-1201.21, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1201.21 (1) There is hereby created the Job Training Cash Fund.
The fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Economic
Development. Money may be transferred to the fund pursuant to subdivision
(1)(b)(iii) of section 48-621 and from the Cash Reserve Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The department shall establish a subaccount
for all money transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Job Training
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2005.
(2) The money in the Job Training Cash Fund or the subaccount
established in subsection (1) of this section shall be used (a) to
provide reimbursements for job training activities, including employee
assessment, preemployment training, on-the-job training, training
equipment costs, and other reasonable costs related to helping industry
and business locate or expand in Nebraska, (b) to provide upgrade skills
training of the existing labor force necessary to adapt to new technology
or the introduction of new product lines, (c) as provided in section
79-2308, or (d) as provided in section 48-3405. The department shall give
a preference to job training activities carried out in whole or in part
within an enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act
or an opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act, Public Law 115-97.
(3) The department shall establish a subaccount within the fund to
provide training grants for training employees and potential employees of
businesses that (a) employ twenty-five or fewer employees on the
application date, (b) employ, or train for potential employment,
residents of rural areas of Nebraska, or (c) are located in or employ, or
train for potential employment, residents of high-poverty areas as
defined in section 81-1203. The department shall calculate the amount of
prior year investment income earnings accruing to the fund and allocate
such amount to the subaccount for training grants under this subsection.
-2-

LB423 LB423
2025 2025
The subaccount shall also be used as provided in the Teleworker Job
Creation Act. The department shall give a preference to training grants
for businesses located in whole or in part within an enterprise zone
designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act.
(4) On April 5, 2018, any funds that were dedicated to carrying out
sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03 but were not yet expended shall be
transferred to the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund.
(4) (5) Transfers may be made from the Job Training Cash Fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Job
Training Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1210.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1210.04 (1) The Intern Nebraska Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be used to carry out sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03, as such
sections existed prior to the operative date of this act. The fund shall
consist of money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and money
donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private
entities. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The Department of Economic Development, or any entity with which
the department contracts for such purpose, may use up to five percent of
any appropriation to carry out sections 81-1210.01 to 81-1210.03, as such
sections existed prior to the operative date of this act, for
administrative services.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds
remaining in the Intern Nebraska Cash Fund to the General Fund on or
before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
-3-

LB423 LB423
2025 2025
Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-1201.21 and 81-1210.04, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
81-1210.01, 81-1210.02, and 81-1210.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-